Maryland, session 2026, SB0997.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
2–110.
(a) In this section, “public service company” includes an electricity supplier and a
gas supplier as those terms are defined in § 1–101 of this article.
(b) (1) The costs and expenses of the Commission, the Strategic Energy
Planning Office, and the Office of People’s Counsel shall be borne by the public service
companies that are subject to the Commission’s jurisdiction.
(2) The costs and expenses shall be assessed as provided in this section.
(3) The Commission shall pay the money that it collects for the assessment
under this section into the Public Utility Regulation Fund in the State Treasury established
under § 2–110.1 of this subtitle to reimburse the State for the expenses of the Commission,
the Strategic Energy Planning Office, and the Office of People’s Counsel.
(c) (12) The total amount that may be charged to a public service company
under this section for a State fiscal year may not exceed:
(i) [0.50%] 0.25% of the public service company’s gross operating
revenues derived from intrastate utility and electricity supplier operations in the preceding
calendar year, or other 12–month period that the Chairman determines, for the costs and
expenses of the Commission other than that of the Strategic Energy Planning Office and
the Office of People’s Counsel; plus
(ii) 0.074% of those revenues for the costs and expenses of the
Strategic Energy Planning Office; plus
(iii) 0.074% of those revenues for the costs and expenses of the Office
of People’s Counsel.
7–316.

SENATE BILL 997 3
(a) In this section, “marketing” does not include materials to educate or inform,
IN A NEUTRAL MANNER, a retail customer about standard offer service, default gas
commodity service, or customer choice.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, an electric company or a
gas company may not recover through its rates any costs associated with marketing its
services.
(c) An electric cooperative may recover through its rates any costs associated with
marketing its services, including the costs associated with materials that educate or inform,
IN A NEUTRAL MANNER, a retail customer about standard offer service or customer choice.
(d) The Commission may, by regulation, adopt criteria for reviewing marketing
and other communication materials of an electric company or a gas company to determine
whether the cost of the materials may be recovered through the company’s rates.
7–507.
(a) A person, other than an electric company providing standard offer service
under § 7–510(c) of this subtitle, a municipal electric utility serving customers solely in its
distribution territory, the Department of General Services selling energy under § 7–704.4
of this title, or a community choice aggregator under § 7–510.3 of this subtitle, may not
engage in the business of an electricity supplier in the State unless the person holds a
license issued by the Commission.
(l) (4) Each INSTANCE OF A customer [to whom electricity is] BEING sold or
offered ELECTRICITY in violation of this section is a separate violation.
7–510.
(d) (1) This subsection applies to residential electricity supply other than
supply offered through:
(i) standard offer service;
(ii) the Department of General Services’ sale of energy under §
7–704.4 of this title; or
(iii) a community choice aggregator under § 7–510.3 of this subtitle.
(2) A residential electricity supplier:
(i) [may offer electricity, other than green power, only at a price that
does not exceed the trailing 12–month average of the electric company’s standard offer
service rate in the electric company’s service territory as of the date of agreement with the
customer;

SENATE BILL 997
(ii)] may offer residential electricity supply only for a term not to
exceed [12] 36 months at a time;
[(iii)] (II) may, for electricity supply other than green power,
automatically renew the term only if the electricity supplier provides notice to the customer
[90] 60 days before and 30 days before renewal;
[(iv)] (III) may offer green power that meets the requirements of §
7–707 of this title, but may not automatically renew the term with the customer;
[(v) subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, may not offer a
variable rate other than a rate that adjusts for seasonal variation not more than twice in a
single year; and
(vi)] (IV) may not pay a commission or other incentive–based
compensation to an energy salesperson for enrolling customers;
(V) 1. MAY OFFER CANCELLATION OR EARLY TERMINATION
OF AN ELECTRICITY SUPPLY AGREEMENT WITH A 3–DAY RESCISSION PERIOD; AND
2. MAY NOT IMPOSE ON A CUSTOMER A FEE FOR
CANCELLATION OR EARLY TERMINATION OF AN ELECTRICITY SUPPLY AGREEMENT
THAT EXCEEDS THE GREATER OF:
A. $200; OR
B. 5% OF THE REMAINING VALUE OF THE AGREEMENT;
(VI) MAY NOT OFFER INDUCEMENTS, INCLUDING:
1. GIFT CARDS;
2. MONEY;
3. PRIZES;
4. TRIPS; OR
5. ANY OTHER ITEMS CONTINGENT ON ENROLLMENT;
(VII) MAY NOT ENGAGE IN DOOR–TO–DOOR SOLICITATION
UNLESS AS PART OF A CUSTOMER–INITIATED APPOINTMENT; AND

SENATE BILL 997 5
(VIII) MAY PROVIDE EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS:
1. WITH A VALUE OF $10 OR LESS; AND
2. THAT ARE NOT CONTINGENT ON ENROLLMENT.
(3) [Paragraph (2)(v) of this subsection does not prohibit the offer and use
of time–of–use rates that establish different rates for periods within a single day.
(4)] A residential electricity supplier may not sell to an electric company,
and an electric company may not purchase from the electricity supplier, accounts
receivable.
(4) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS:
(I) DEFINING ACTIONS PROHIBITED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION;
AND
(II) SPECIFYING THE PROCESS FOR ENFORCING THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBSECTION.
7–603.1.
(b) (1) (i) A gas supplier, an energy vendor, or any other person, except for
an energy salesperson, selling or offering to sell gas in the State in violation of this section
or § 7–603 of this subtitle, after notice and an opportunity for a hearing, is subject to:
1. a civil penalty of not more than $25,000 for the violation;
2. license denial, revocation, or suspension or refusal to
renew the license; or
3. both.
(ii) An energy salesperson selling or offering to sell gas in the State
in violation of this section or § 7–603 of this subtitle, after notice and an opportunity for a
hearing, is subject to license denial, revocation, or suspension or refusal to renew the
license.
(3) Each INSTANCE OF A customer [to whom gas is] BEING sold or offered
GAS in violation of this section is a separate violation.
7–604.2.
(a) In this section, “default gas commodity service” means the supply of retail gas
commodity service by a customer’s gas company.

SENATE BILL 997
(b) (1) This subsection applies to residential gas supply other than default gas
commodity service provided by a gas company.
(2) A gas supplier that supplies gas to residential retail gas customers:
(i) [may offer gas service only at a price that does not exceed the
trailing 12–month average of the gas company’s default gas commodity service in the gas
company’s service territory as of the date of the agreement with the customer;
(ii)] may offer residential gas supply only for a term not to exceed [12]
36 months at a time and may automatically renew the term only if the gas supplier provides
notice to the customer [90] 60 days before and 30 days before renewal;
[(iii) subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, may not offer a
variable rate other than a rate that adjusts for seasonal variation not more than twice in a
single year; and
(iv)] (II) may not pay a commission or other incentive–based
compensation to an energy salesperson for enrolling customers;
(III) 1. MAY OFFER CANCELLATION OR EARLY TERMINATION
OF A GAS SUPPLY AGREEMENT WITH A 3–DAY RESCISSION PERIOD; AND
2. MAY NOT IMPOSE ON A CUSTOMER A FEE FOR
CANCELLATION OR EARLY TERMINATION OF A GAS SUPPLY AGREEMENT THAT
EXCEEDS THE GREATER OF:
A. $200; OR
B. 5% OF THE REMAINING VALUE OF THE AGREEMENT;
(IV) MAY NOT OFFER INDUCEMENTS, INCLUDING:
1. GIFT CARDS;
2. MONEY;
3. PRIZES;
4. TRIPS; OR
5. ANY OTHER ITEMS CONTINGENT ON ENROLLMENT;

SENATE BILL 997 7
(V) MAY NOT ENGAGE IN DOOR–TO–DOOR SOLICITATION
UNLESS AS PART OF A CUSTOMER–INITIATED APPOINTMENT; AND
(VI) MAY PROVIDE EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS:
1. WITH A VALUE OF $10 OR LESS; AND
2. THAT ARE NOT CONTINGENT ON ENROLLMENT.
(3) [Paragraph (2)(iii) of this subsection does not prohibit the offer and use
of rates that differ based on the total number of therms used by a customer in any billing
period.
(4)] A gas supplier that supplies gas to residential retail gas customers may
not sell to a gas company, and a gas company may not purchase from the gas supplier,
accounts receivable.
(4) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS:
(I) DEFINING ACTIONS PROHIBITED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION;
AND
(II) SPECIFYING THE PROCESS FOR ENFORCING THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBSECTION.
7–707.
(a) In this section, “green power” means energy sources or renewable energy
credits that are marketed as clean, green, eco–friendly, environmentally friendly or
responsible, carbon–free, renewable, 100% renewable, 100% wind, 100% hydro, 100% solar,
100% emission–free, or similar claims.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(1) the Department of General Services when the Department of General
Services sells energy under § 7–704.4 of this subtitle;
(2) a community choice aggregator under § 7–510.3 of this title; or
(3) an electricity supplier when supplying electricity to commercial retail
electric customers.
(c) An electricity supplier that supplies electricity to residential retail electric
customers may not market electricity as green power unless:

SENATE BILL 997
(1) the percentage of the electricity being offered, or the equivalent number
of renewable energy credits associated with the electricity being marketed as green power,
that is eligible for inclusion in meeting the renewable energy portfolio standard equals or
exceeds the greater of:
(i) 51%; or
(ii) 1% higher than the renewable energy portfolio standard for the
year the electricity is provided to the customer; AND
(2) [the Commission approves the price of the electricity being marketed
as green power in accordance with subsection (d) of this section; and
(3)] the electricity supplier submits an application to the Commission that:
(i) describes the electricity being marketed as green power,
including the green power source and percentage of the electricity that is green power;
(ii) describes how the green power complies with State law and
regulations; and
(iii) includes any other information the Commission considers
necessary.
(d) [(1) The price approved by the Commission under subsection (c)(2) of this
section shall be determined through:
(i) a proceeding held in accordance with paragraph (2) of this
subsection; or
(ii) a proceeding held in accordance with paragraph (3) of this
subsection.
(2) (i) Each year the Commission shall hold a proceeding to set a price
per megawatt–hour for electricity marketed as green power under this section that may
not be exceeded by an electricity supplier except as provided in paragraph (3) of this
subsection.
(ii) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, the price set by the
Commission under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph may:
1. exceed the maximum price per megawatt–hour that is
authorized under § 7–510(d)(2)(i) of this title; and
2. differ based on the amount and source of the electricity
generation.

SENATE BILL 997 9
(iii) During a proceeding held under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph, the Commission:
1. shall consider:
A. the price of the energy purchased, including the total cost
of the renewable energy credits;
B. the amount of electricity that is eligible for inclusion in
meeting the renewable energy portfolio standard;
C. the state in which the electricity was generated; and
D. applicable market data; and
2. may consider whether the purchase of renewable energy
credits was bundled with a power purchase agreement from the energy sources associated
with the credit.
(3) (i) On request by an electricity supplier, the Commission shall hold
a proceeding to set a price per megawatt–hour for electricity marketed as green power for
that electricity supplier.
(ii) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, at a proceeding held
under this paragraph the Commission may set a price per megawatt–hour that is higher
than the price determined in the proceeding held under paragraph (2) of this subsection for
an electricity supplier if:
1. the electricity supplier demonstrates to the Commission’s
satisfaction, based on an independent third–party audit, that the actual cost to the
electricity supplier for the generation or supply of electricity exceeds that of the price
determined through the proceeding held in accordance with paragraph (2) of this
subsection;
2. the increased price reflects only the cost of the electricity
marketed as green power and is not associated with any of the electricity supplier’s other
costs; and
3. the electricity supplier demonstrates to the Commission’s
satisfaction that the electricity supplier has a significant long–term investment in
renewable energy that meets the renewable energy portfolio standard under § 7–703 of this
subtitle.
(iii) During a proceeding held under this paragraph, the Commission
shall consider:

SENATE BILL 997
1. whether the purchase of renewable energy credits was
bundled with a power purchase agreement from the energy sources associated with the
credit;
2. the price of the energy purchased, including the total cost
of the renewable energy credits or power purchase agreements;
3. the amount of electricity that is eligible for inclusion in
meeting the renewable energy portfolio standard;
4. the state in which the electricity was generated; and
5. applicable market data.
(4) (i) A price approved by the Commission under this subsection may
not exceed 150% of the maximum price per megawatt–hour that is authorized under §
7–510(d)(2)(i) of this title unless the Commission determines that the actual cost of the
green power exceeds that amount.
(ii) Within 120 days after approving a price for green power that
exceeds 150% of the maximum price per megawatt–hour that is authorized under §
7–510(d)(2)(i) of this title, and annually for as long as the price exceeds that amount, the
Commission shall submit a report to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of
the State Government Article, that:
1. demonstrates that the approved price represents only the
actual price of the green power; and
2. includes the Commission’s order authorizing the price of
the green power.
(iii) If the Commission has approved for 3 consecutive years a price
for green power that exceeds 150% of the maximum price per megawatt–hour that is
authorized under § 7–510(d)(2)(i) of this title, the Commission shall include in the annual
report required under subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph:
1. information on market conditions that necessitate the
approved price of the green power that exceeds 150% of the maximum price per
megawatt–hour that is authorized under § 7–510(d)(2)(i) of this title; and
2. a recommendation of whether to increase the limitation on
the maximum price of green power above which the Commission is required to make a
determination under this paragraph.
(5) The Commission:

SENATE BILL 997 11
(i) shall annually review a price approved under paragraph (3) of
this subsection; and
(ii) may, on its own initiative, or on petition by the Office of People’s
Counsel, require an electricity supplier offering green power under a price established
under paragraph (3) of this subsection to demonstrate that the price continues to meet the
requirements of paragraph (3) of this subsection.
(e)] (1) On and after January 1, 2025, an electricity supplier shall purchase
renewable energy credits for each year the electricity supplier offers green power for sale
to residential retail electric customers.
(2) A renewable energy credit an electricity supplier purchases under
paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be retired in a PJM Environmental Information
Services, Inc., generation attribute tracking system reserve subaccount accessible by the
Commission.
[(f)] (E) (1) This subsection does not apply to:
(i) the Department of General Services when the Department of
General Services sells energy under § 7–704.4 of this subtitle; or
(ii) a community choice aggregator under § 7–510.3 of this title.
(2) An electricity supplier that claims in the electricity supplier’s
marketing of electricity to residential retail electric customers that the customer will be
purchasing green power shall include the following disclosure or a similar disclosure
approved by the Commission:
“We deliver energy through the purchase of Renewable Energy Credits (RECs). A
REC represents the social good that accompanies 1 megawatt–hour of renewable electricity
generation. RECs may be sold separately from renewable electricity itself. Renewable
electricity and RECs may be sold to different entities. The purchase of a REC does not
indicate that renewable electricity itself has been purchased by the entity that purchased
the REC.”.
[(g)] (F) In addition to the disclosure required under subsection [(f)] (E) of this
section, the Commission shall adopt regulations that require an electricity supplier, other
than the Department of General Services when the Department of General Services sells
energy under § 7–704.4 of this subtitle or a community choice aggregator under § 7–510.3
of this title, that offers green power for sale to residential retail customers to include in the
electricity supplier’s marketing materials a disclosure, written in plain language, that
explains:
(1) what the customer will actually be paying for when the customer
purchases green power from the electricity supplier;

SENATE BILL 997
(2) how the electricity that the customer has purchased is generated;
(3) how the green power will benefit the environment;
(4) the percentage of electricity that would be provided by the electricity
supplier that is eligible for inclusion in meeting the renewable energy portfolio standard;
and
(5) the state in which the electricity was generated.
[(h)] (G) The Commission, in its discretion, may determine whether an
electricity supplier is marketing electricity in accordance with this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the division within the Public
Service Commission established in accordance with Section 2 of Chapter 537 of the Acts of
the General Assembly of 2024 shall be abolished. Any Position Identification Numbers
(PINs) created in accordance with Section 2 of Chapter 537 of the Acts of the General
Assembly of 2024 shall remain with the Commission and any employee hired or assigned
to that division shall be reassigned to an equivalent position elsewhere within the
Commission. No employee affected by a reassignment in accordance with this section shall
suffer any diminution in pay or benefits resulting from the reassignment.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before January 1, 2027,
the Public Service Commission shall adopt regulations to carry out this Act.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any electricity supply agreement or gas supply agreement that is in effect on
or before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.